src/fst/orthography/spellrelax.regex
[ á (->) á,
Á (->) Á,
é (->) é,
É (->) É,
í (->) í,
Í (->) Í,
ó (->) ó,
Ó (->) Ó,
ú (->) ú,
Ú (->) Ú,
đ (->) ð,
ŋ (->) ń, # precomposed
ŋ (->) ń, # n + combining acure
ŋ (->) ñ, # ditto
ŋ (->) ñ,
æ (->) ä, # ditto, etc.
æ (->) ä,
Æ (->) Ä,
Æ (->) Ä,
ø (->) ö,
ø (->) ö,
Ø (->) Ö,
Ø (->) Ö,
ö (->) ø,
ö (->) ø,
Ö (->) Ø,
Ö (->) Ø,
ü (->) u, # Somali
Ü (->) Ü, # Somali
ï (->) i, # sma norm
І (->) I, # Komi cyrillic (->) latin
і (->) i, # Komi etc
Ӧ (->) Ö, # Komi
Ӧ (->) Ö, # Komi
ӧ (->) ö, # Komi
ӧ (->) ö, # Komi
ӯ (->) ӯ, # Cyrillic у + U+0304 (->) precomposed
ӣ (->) ӣ, # Cyrillic и + U+0304 (->) precomposed
ӯ (->) у, # Cyrillic у + U+0304 (->) basic
ӣ (->) и, # Cyrillic и + U+0304 (->) basic
          # We use composing letters, may get precomposed input
          # (No other long Cyrillic vowels precomposed)
а̄ (->) а, # Cyrillic for sjd
е̄ (->) е, # Cyrillic for sjd
о̄ (->) о, # Cyrillic for sjd
ӯ (->) у, # Cyrillic for sjd
ы̄ (->) ы, # Cyrillic for sjd
ю̄ (->) ю, # Cyrillic for sjd
я̄ (->) я, # Cyrillic for sjd
ӣ (->) и, # Cyrillic for sjd
ˊ (->) ´, # 00B4 ACUTE ACCENT for Skolt 02CA MIDIFIER LETTER ACUTE ACCENT
#' (->) 0, # Inari optional ' mark
Ï (->) I ,
а́ (->) а, # Russian long vowel, accept short
е́ (->) е, # Russian long vowel, accept short
и́ (->) и, # Russian long vowel, accept short
о́ (->) о, # Russian long vowel, accept short
у́ (->) у, # Russian long vowel, accept short
я́ (->) я, # Russian long vowel, accept short
ё (->) е, # Russian long vowel, accept je pro jo
ы́ (->) ы, # Russian long vowel, accept short
ю́ (->) ю, # Russian long vowel, accept short
' (->) ’,
' (->) %` ]

# Q'eqchi' spellrelax
.o. [ a (->) 0 || _ a ] # long vowell accept short

.o. [ e (->) 0 || _ e ] # long vowell accept short

.o. [ i (->) 0 || _ i ] # long vowell accept short

.o. [ o (->) 0 || _ o ] # long vowell accept short

.o. [ u (->) 0 || _ u ] # long vowell accept short

;

# Explanation:
# lexical side (->) input

# Future thought:
# A posible change is to split this file into lg-specific files.
# As the number of language grow, this might be more relevant.
# Especially conflicting rules a -> b, b -> a in different lgs
# might force a split of this file.

# Note:
# Some of the lines above seem to contain identical letters,
# and in some cases the same right-hand letter seems to occure twice.
# In each case, the __second__ of these is a non-precomposed letter.
# In order to check which one is which one, open this file in emacs
# and read through the line with the arrow key. The letters who span over
# two characters (press arrow twice) are the precomposed ones.

# Note that the ï/Ï letters are there for sma.
# They are probably substandard, and should be relegated to sma.fst
# but removed from a sma.norm.fst.
